Washington statutes.
RCW 36.49.050

"County dog license tax fund"—Created.

All license taxes collected in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall be placed in a separate fund in the office of the county treasurer to be known as the "county dog license tax fund."

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.49.050. Prior: 1929 c 198 s 4; RRS s 8304-4; prior: 1919 c 6 s 2, part.]